Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1254.03
Boating
under influence of alcoholic
liquor or drug; choice of test; privileges of person tested.

The peace officer who requires
a chemical blood, breath, or urine test or tests pursuant to section 37-1254.02 may
direct whether the test or
tests shall be of blood, breath, or urine. When the officer directs that the
test or tests shall
be of a person's blood, the person tested shall be permitted to have a physician
of his or her choice evaluate his or her condition and perform or have performed
whatever laboratory tests such person tested deems appropriate in addition
to and following the test or
tests administered at the direction of the peace officer. If the officer refuses to permit
such additional test or tests to
be taken, then the original test or
tests shall not be competent as evidence. Upon request the results
of the test or tests taken
at the direction of the peace officer
shall be made available to the person being tested.

Laws 1989, LB 195, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 12.